src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON нсв_12a_R
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON нсв_12a_R_наст._бре/|юсь,_ется
+V+Impf+IV:и́ Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV:е́ Impf_Pres_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON нсв_12a_ы́ть
нсв_нп_12a_ы́ть ;
+V+Impf+TV:ы́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:о́ Impf_Pres_1_stem_w/Pass ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_12a_ы́ть
+V+Impf+IV:ы́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV:о́ Impf_Pres_1_stem ;

LEXICON нсв_12a_ы́ть_R
+V+Impf+IV:ы́ Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV:о́ Impf_Pres_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON нсв_12b_наст._пою/,_поёт_прич._страд._наст._нет
+V+Impf+TV:е́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:о́ Impf_Pres_1_end_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+IV:е́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV:о́ Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON нсв_12b_R_безл._наст._поётся
+V+Impf+IV:е́ Impf_Inf_stem_R_безл. ;
+V+Impf+IV:о Impf_Pres_1_end_R_безл. ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_12b/c
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Inf_V_shift ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON св_12a ! not ыть
св_нп_12a ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: PastPass_stem ;

LEXICON св_нп_12a
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_12a_выпеть
+V+Perf+IV:е Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:о Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:е Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:о Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:е PastPass_stem ;

LEXICON св_12a_R ! not ыть
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON св_12a_R_-бриться
+V+Perf+IV:бри́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:бре́ Perf_Fut_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON св_12a_R_выбриться
+V+Perf+IV:бри Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:бре Perf_Fut_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON св_12a_ыть
+V+Perf+TV:ы Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:ы Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:о Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:о Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ы PastPass_stem ;

LEXICON св_12a_ыть_R
+V+Perf+IV:ы Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:о Perf_Fut_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON св_12a_ы́ть
св_нп_12a_ы́ть ;
+V+Perf+TV:ы́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:о́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ы́ PastPass_stem ;

LEXICON св_нп_12a_ы́ть
+V+Perf+IV:ы́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:о́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_нп_12a_ы́ть_буд._и_повел._затрудн.
+V+Perf+IV:ы́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:о́ Perf_Fut_1_stem_Prb ;

LEXICON св_12a_ы́ть_R
+V+Perf+IV:ы́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:о́ Perf_Fut_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON св_12b_буд._пою/,_ёт
+V+Perf+TV:е́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:е́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:о́ Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+IV:о́ Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:е́ PastPass_stem ;

LEXICON св_нп_12b/c
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_V_shift ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;

!- - - - - - - Stem type 12 Lexicalized participial forms- - - - - - - 

LEXICON св_12a_Lxc ! not ыть
св_нп_12a_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: PastPass_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_12a_ы́ть_Lxc
св_нп_12a_ы́ть_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:ы́ Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:о́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ы́ PastPass_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_нп_12a_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_нп_12a_ы́ть_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV:ы́ Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+IV:о́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

!====================================== Stem type 13 =====================================
!                                           авать
! TODO 13 has present passive ppl (high/archaic register)

LEXICON нсв_13b
нсв_нп_13b ;
+V+Impf+TV:ва́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_end_w/Pass_авать ;
+V+Impf+TV:ва́ PresVrbAdv_stem ;
+V+Impf+TV:ва́е PresPass ;

LEXICON нсв_13b_R
+V+Impf+IV:ва́ Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end_R_авать ;
+V+Impf+IV:ва́ PresVrbAdv_stem_R ;

LEXICON нсв_13b_R_безл.
+V+Impf+IV:ва́ Impf_Inf_stem_R_безл. ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end_R_безл. ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_13b
+V+Impf+IV:ва́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end_авать ;
+V+Impf+IV:ва́ PresVrbAdv_stem ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_13b_безл.
+V+Impf+IV:ва́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_безл. ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end_безл. ;

LEXICON св_13b?
св_нп_13b ;
+V+Perf+TV:ва́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_end_авать ;

LEXICON св_нп_13b
+V+Perf+IV:ва́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_end_авать ;

!- - - - - - - Stem type 13 Lexicalized participial forms- - - - - - - 

LEXICON нсв_13b_Lxc
нсв_нп_13b_Lxc ;
+V+Impf+TV:ва́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass_Lxc ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_end_w/Pass_авать_Lxc ;
+V+Impf+TV:ва́ PresVrbAdv_stem ;
+V+Impf+TV:ва́е PresPass_Lxc ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_13b_Lxc
+V+Impf+IV:ва́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end_авать_Lxc ;
+V+Impf+IV:ва́ PresVrbAdv_stem ;

!====================================== Stem type 14 =====================================
!                                   занять, взять, etc.
! No present verbal adverb

LEXICON нсв_14b_(-м-)_а́ть
+V+Impf+TV:а́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:м Impf_Pres_1_end_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+IV:а́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV:м Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON нсв_14b_(-м-)_а́ть_R
+V+Impf+IV:а́ Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV:м Impf_Pres_1_end_R ;

LEXICON св_14a_(-м-)_ать
+V+Perf+TV:а Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:м Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:а Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:м Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_14a_(-м-)_ать_R
+V+Perf+IV:а Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:м Perf_Fut_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON св_14a_(-н-)_ать
+V+Perf+TV:а Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:н Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:а Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:н Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_14a_(-н-)_ять
+V+Perf+TV:я Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:н Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:я Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:н Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_14b_(-м-)_а́ть
+V+Perf+TV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:м Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+IV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:м Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_14b_(-м-)_а́ть_R
+V+Perf+IV:а́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:м Perf_Fut_1_end_R ;

LEXICON нсв_14b_(-н-)_а́ть
+V+Impf+TV:а́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:н Impf_Pres_1_end_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+IV:а́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV:н Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON нсв_14b_(-н-)_я́ть
+V+Impf+TV:я́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:н Impf_Pres_1_end_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+IV:я́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV:н Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON нсв_14b_(-н-)_я́ть_R
+V+Impf+IV:я́ Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV:н Impf_Pres_1_end_R ;

LEXICON св_14b_(-н-)_а́ть
+V+Perf+IV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:н Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:н Perf_Fut_1_end ;
! TODO Past passive?

LEXICON св_14b_(-н-)_а́ть_R
+V+Perf+IV:а́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:н Perf_Fut_1_end_R ;

LEXICON св_14b_(-н-)_я́ть
+V+Perf+IV:я́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:н Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:я́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:н Perf_Fut_1_end ;
! TODO Past passive?

LEXICON св_14b_(-н-)_я́ть_R
+V+Perf+IV:я́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:н Perf_Fut_1_end_R ;

LEXICON св_14b/b_(-н-)_а́ть_R
+V+Perf+IV:а́ Perf_Inf_end_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:н Perf_Fut_1_end_R ;

LEXICON св_14b/b_(-н-)_а́ть_R_прош._м_начался/
+V+Perf+IV:а́ Perf_Inf_end''_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:н Perf_Fut_1_end_R ;

LEXICON св_14b/b_я́ть_R_(йм-)
+V+Perf+IV:ня́ Perf_Inf_end_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:йм Perf_Fut_1_end_R ;

LEXICON св_14b/b_я́ть_R_(йм-)_прош._м_ся///_ня/лся
+V+Perf+IV:ня́ Perf_Inf_end''_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:йм Perf_Fut_1_end_R ;

LEXICON св_14b/c_взять
+V+Perf+TV:зя́ Perf_Inf_V_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:озьм Perf_Fut_1_end ; 
+V+Perf+TV:зя́ PastPass_stem ;

LEXICON св_14b/c''_я́ть_R_взяться
+V+Perf+TV:зя́ Perf_Inf_shift_R ;
+V+Perf+TV:озьм Perf_Fut_1_end_R ; 

LEXICON св_14b/c_(-н-)_а́ть
+V+Perf+TV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:н Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+IV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_shift ;
+V+Perf+IV:н Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:а́ PastPass_stem ;

LEXICON св_14b/c_(-н-)1
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Inf_V_shift1_а́ть ;
+V+Perf+TV:н Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_V_shift1_а́ть ;
+V+Perf+IV:н Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:а PastPass_stem ;

LEXICON св_14b/c_(-н-)1_а́ть
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Inf_V_shift1_а́ть ;
+V+Perf+TV:н Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_V_shift1_а́ть ;
+V+Perf+IV:н Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:а PastPass_stem ;
