src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb
греться:гре́ нсв_12a_R "weight: 2.1888847170791617" ;
дуться:ду́ нсв_12a_R ;
бриться:бр нсв_12a_R_наст._бре/|юсь,_ется "weight: 1.5261268853975876" ;
рыть:р нсв_12a_ы́ть "weight: 1.9411002333684055" ;
крыть:кр нсв_12a_ы́ть "weight: 3.149376175795488" ;
рыться:р нсв_12a_ы́ть_R "weight: 1.8271568810615688" ;
крыться:кр нсв_12a_ы́ть_R "weight: 1.6053081314452122" ;
петься:п нсв_12b_R_безл._наст._поётся "weight: 1.5261268853975876" ;
петь:п нсв_12b_наст._пою/,_поёт_прич._страд._наст._нет "weight: 3.6904797411820245" ;
додавать:дода нсв_13b ;
распознавать:распозна нсв_13b "weight: 2.2250968897336065" ;
раздаваться:разда нсв_13b_R "weight: 2.8048804863504166" ;
отдаваться:отда нсв_13b_R "weight: 2.470609557547756" ;
воздаваться:возда нсв_13b_R_безл. "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
жать:ж нсв_14b_(-м-)_а́ть "weight: 2.332306859381475" ;
жаться:ж нсв_14b_(-м-)_а́ть_R "weight: 2.3185185748958412" ;
жать:ж нсв_14b_(-н-)_а́ть "weight: 2.332306859381475" ;
мять:м нсв_14b_(-н-)_я́ть "weight: 2.345670820939456" ;
мяться:м нсв_14b_(-н-)_я́ть_R "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
выть:в нсв_нп_12a_ы́ть "weight: 2.6467008166034374" ;
ныть:н нсв_нп_12a_ы́ть "weight: 2.633336855045456" ;
гнить:гни́ нсв_нп_12b/c "weight: 3.1081902483092962" ;
привставать:привста нсв_нп_13b ;
приставать:приста нсв_нп_13b "weight: 1.9063381271091935" ;
недоставать:недоста нсв_нп_13b_безл. "weight: 2.450406171459469" ;
перебрить:перебри́ св_12a ;
раздуть:разду́ св_12a "weight: 3.0285540053820204" ;
согреться:согре́ св_12a_R "weight: 1.6722549210758255" ;
вздуться:взду́ св_12a_R "weight: 2.559550640884537" ;
обриться:о св_12a_R_-бриться ;
побриться:по св_12a_R_-бриться "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
выбриться:вы́ св_12a_R_выбриться ;
выпеть:вы́п св_12a_выпеть "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
обрыть:обр св_12a_ы́ть ;
скрыть:скр св_12a_ы́ть "weight: 4.1072797773638765" ;
помыться:пом св_12a_ы́ть_R "weight: 1.5261268853975876" ;
подрыться:подр св_12a_ы́ть_R ;
выкрыть:вы́кр св_12a_ыть ;
вырыть:вы́р св_12a_ыть "weight: 3.299913330378781" ;
вымыться:вы́м св_12a_ыть_R "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
вырыться:вы́р св_12a_ыть_R ;
допеть:доп св_12b_буд._пою/,_ёт "weight: 1.8271568810615688" ;
распеть:расп св_12b_буд._пою/,_ёт ;
наподдавать:наподда св_13b? ;
передавать:переда св_13b? "weight: 3.599478587784488" ;
выжать:в%^Yж св_14a_(-м-)_ать "weight: 2.678415229780644" ;
выжаться:в%^Yж св_14a_(-м-)_ать_R ;
выжать:в%^Yж св_14a_(-н-)_ать "weight: 2.678415229780644" ;
вымять:в%^Yм св_14a_(-н-)_ять ;
пережать:переж св_14b_(-м-)_а́ть "weight: 2.0576058024398427" ;
отжать:от%^oж св_14b_(-м-)_а́ть "weight: 2.2073681227731745" ;
разжаться:раз%^oж св_14b_(-м-)_а́ть_R "weight: 1.6722549210758255" ;
сжаться:с%^oж св_14b_(-м-)_а́ть_R "weight: 2.6400702377044243" ;
прожать:прож св_14b_(-н-)_а́ть ;
обжаться:об%^oж св_14b_(-н-)_а́ть_R ;
приумять:приум св_14b_(-н-)_я́ть ;
помяться:пом св_14b_(-н-)_я́ть_R "weight: 1.5261268853975876" ;
зачаться:зач св_14b/b_(-н-)_а́ть_R ;
начаться:нач св_14b/b_(-н-)_а́ть_R_прош._м_начался/ "weight: 3.928560231616899" ;
наняться:на св_14b/b_я́ть_R_(йм-)_прош._м_ся///_ня/лся "weight: 1.5261268853975876" ;
позаняться:поза св_14b/b_я́ть_R_(йм-) ;
взять:в св_14b/c_взять "weight: 4.700477482876967" ;
зачать:зач св_14b/c_(-н-)_а́ть "weight: 3.0576058024398427" ;
начать:на́ч св_14b/c_(-н-)1 "weight: 4.314012236338511" ;
взяться:в св_14b/c''_я́ть_R_взяться "weight: 3.46962140130369" ;
опочить:опочи́ св_нп_12a "weight: 1.429216872389531" ;
подуть:поду́ св_нп_12a "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
провыть:пров св_нп_12a_ы́ть ;
изныть:изн св_нп_12a_ы́ть "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
приуныть:приун св_нп_12a_ы́ть_буд._и_повел._затрудн. "weight: 1.9411002333684055" ;
обгнить:обгни́ св_нп_12b/c ;
подгнить:подгни́ св_нп_12b/c "weight: 2.7716395532117373" ;
погнить:погни́ св_нп_12b/c "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
повставать:повста св_нп_13b ;
LEXICON LexicalizedParticiple
предавать:преда нсв_13b_Lxc "weight: 2.258520645220556" ;
признавать:призна нсв_13b_Lxc "weight: 3.408081856737188" ;
надуть:наду́ св_12a_Lxc "weight: 2.9411002333684055" ;
скрыть:скр св_12a_ы́ть_Lxc "weight: 4.1072797773638765" ;
открыть:откр св_12a_ы́ть_Lxc "weight: 4.642003549666032" ;
